Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Use of Prisoners in County Jails to Maintain Certain Historic Cemeteries and Serve Food in Conjunction With Nonprofit Organizations

§ 47-5-441.
Use of county prisoners to preserve and maintain certain historic cemeteries and use of county prison labor to prepare and serve food in county or public facilities in conjunction with certain nonprofit organizations.

Any sheriff, or his designee, may use any person who has been convicted of a nonviolent offense and who is serving all or any part of his sentence in the county jail to clear, clean, stabilize, preserve, maintain and restore historic cemeteries in the county. For the purposes of this section the term “historic cemeteries” means cemeteries that are at least one hundred (100) years old.

Before undertaking work on an historic cemetery, the sheriff, or his designee, shall contact the Department of Archives and History to obtain information on the appropriate procedures for the preservation and restoration of an historical cemetery.

Any sheriff, or his designee, may use any person who has been convicted of a crime and is serving all or part of his sentence in the county jail, who volunteers his time, to prepare or serve food in county or public facilities in conjunction with a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2003.).